Kentucky statutes. TITLE XLII Miscellaneous Practice Provisions
Actions for Damages Against Tobacco Growers and Warehousemen

454.450.
Definitions for KRS 452.453 and 454.455.

As used in KRS

452.453

and

454.455

, “tobacco grower” means any person who is a resident of Kentucky engaged in the production of growing tobacco or receives proceeds from the sale of tobacco in Kentucky for consumption or use. “Tobacco grower” as used in this section includes, but is not limited to, farm operator, owner/operator, cash tenant, landlord of a share tenant, share tenant, or share cropper.

As used in KRS

452.453

and

454.455

, “warehouseman” means the owner, operator, manager, lessee, or proprietor of a warehouse engaged in selling tobacco, or his or her agents or employees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 422, § 1, effective April 7, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/98). In codifying this statute, the phrase “As used in this section” in 1998 Ky. Acts ch. 422, sec. 1, has been treated as if it read “As used in this Act.” Otherwise, the definitions in Section 1 of that Act, which are used in Sections 2 and 3 (KRS

452.453

and

454.455

) would be without effect. It is clear from context that this is what must have been intended in drafting this Act. KRS 7.136(1)(h).

454.455.
Proof required for damages against tobacco growers and warehousemen — Costs that may be awarded to prevailing defendant.

In a civil action against a tobacco grower for damages alleged to have occurred as a result of use or consumption of tobacco products, in order for liability to be found against a tobacco grower, the plaintiff shall prove by clear and convincing evidence that the tobacco that caused the alleged damage was planted, cultivated, and harvested by that specific tobacco grower and not by any other person.

In a civil action against a warehouseman for damages alleged to have occurred as a result of use or consumption of tobacco products, in order for liability to be found against a warehouseman, the plaintiff shall prove by clear and convincing evidence that the tobacco that caused the alleged damage was sold by that specific warehouseman and not by any other person.

If a suit against a tobacco grower or a warehouseman is dismissed or the defendant prevails at trial, the defendant may be entitled to three (3) times the entire costs of defending the action, including but not limited to legal fees, expert witnesses, and other expenses arising from the defense of the action.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 422, § 3, effective April 7, 1998.